Washington statutes.
RCW 9.73.060

Violating right of privacy—Civil action—Liability for damages.

Any person who, directly or by means of a detective agency or any other agent, violates the provisions of this chapter shall be subject to legal action for damages, to be brought by any other person claiming that a violation of this statute has injured his or her business, his or her person, or his or her reputation. A person so injured shall be entitled to actual damages, including mental pain and suffering endured by him or her on account of violation of the provisions of this chapter, or liquidated damages computed at the rate of one hundred dollars a day for each day of violation, not to exceed one thousand dollars, and a reasonable attorney's fee and other costs of litigation.

[ 2011 c 336 s 324; 1977 ex.s. c 363 s 2; 1967 ex.s. c 93 s 4.]

NOTES:

Severability—1967 ex.s. c 93: See note following RCW 9.73.030.